Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-4207
Filing of petition or other motion.

The guardian ad litem may file a petition and any other motion the guardian ad litem deems to be in the best interests of the person for whom the guardian ad litem has been appointed.

Laws 2016, LB934, § 20.